Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB768.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 217.015 TO 217.215 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "small farm" means land:
(a) That is used for growing crops or raising livestock;
(b) From which a person prepares or sells food products; and
(c) From which not more than one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) in gross sales, in a single year, is received from:
1. Livestock products;
2. Cultivated or harvested crops; or
3. The sale of food products.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state, and any city,
county, urban-county governments, consolidated local government, unified local
government, or charter county government and any health department thereof
shall not impose any rule, administrative regulation, certification, or licensing
requirement that is not required under federal law on a:
(a) Small farm; or
(b) Home-based processor.
Section 2. The following KRS section is repealed:
217.136 Home-based food processors -- Exemption from permit requirement and fair
packaging and labeling laws -- Production, labeling, and sales of home-processed
food products -- Inspections -- Registration system.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed